Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.51
Local government; emergency expenditures; vote of governing body; when.

In the event of a disaster, emergency, or civil defense emergency, each local government may make emergency expenditures, enter into contracts, and incur obligations for emergency management purposes regardless of existing statutory limitations and requirements pertaining to appropriation, budgeting, levies, or the manner of entering into contracts. If any such expenditure, contract, or obligation will be in excess of or in violation of existing statutory limitations or requirements, then before any such expenditure, contract, or obligation is undertaken it shall be approved by a vote of the governing body of such local government, and such governing body may not vote its approval unless it has secured the certificate of the city, village, county, or interjurisdictional emergency management director serving such local government that such action is necessary in the public interest for emergency management purposes.

Laws 1951, c. 315, § 10(2), p. 1081;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.23;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 31.